Washington statutes.
RCW 18.44.410

Powers of director.

(1) The director has the power and broad administrative discretion to administer and interpret this chapter to facilitate the delivery of services to citizens of this state by escrow agents and others subject to this chapter.

(2) The director may issue rules and regulations to govern the activities of licensed escrow agents and escrow officers. The director shall enforce all laws and rules relating to the licensing of escrow agents and escrow officers and fix the time and places for holding examinations of applicants for licenses and prescribe the method of conducting the examinations. The director may hold hearings and suspend or revoke the licenses of violators and may deny, suspend, or revoke the authority of an escrow officer to act as the designated escrow officer of a person who commits violations of this chapter or of the rules under this chapter.

Except as specifically provided in this chapter, the rules adopted and the hearings conducted shall be in accordance with the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act.

[ 1999 c 30 s 27; 1977 ex.s. c 156 s 25. Formerly RCW 18.44.320.]